District of Columbia statutes.
10-1004

Repealed

Transfers.

Repealed.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1805, 45 DCR 7193
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 63(a), 45 DCR 7193
Mar. 11, 2010, D.C. Law 18-115, § 3(b), 57 DCR 886
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 1032(a), 58 DCR 6226
1981 Ed., § 9-1104.
For temporary addition of section, see § 1405 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-401, July 13, 1998, 45 DCR 4794), and § 1405 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-564, January 12, 1999, 46 DCR 669).
For temporary (90-day) addition of Chapter 11, see notes following § 10-1001.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 1012(a) of Fiscal Year 2012 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-93, June 29, 2011, 58 DCR 5599).